Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-3304
Commissioner of Labor; performance report; duties.

On or before November 30 of each year, the Commissioner of Labor shall submit a copy of the performance report required by section 116(d) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, 29 U.S.C. 3141(d), to the Governor, the Legislature, and the Nebraska Workforce Development Board. The report shall cover the prior program year and shall include the total amount of federal funding provided to the state and to each of the local workforce development areas for the adult, youth, and dislocated worker programs and the amount expended within each program for training services. The report to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 4.
April 14, 2016